Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-227
Acknowledgment before army officers; validity.

The acknowledgment of legal instruments, the attestation of documents, the administration of oaths and other notarial acts, heretofore or hereafter taken before any duly commissioned officer of the army, navy, marine corps, coast guard, or any other component part of the armed forces of the United States are hereby declared legal, valid and binding, and such instrument and documents shall be admissible in evidence and eligible to record in this state under the same circumstances, and with the same force and effect as if such acknowledgment, attestation, oath, affidavit, or other notarial act had been made or taken before a notary public within this state. If the signature, rank and branch of service of any such officer appear upon such instrument or document, no further proof of the authority of such officer to so act shall be required.

Laws 1919, c. 169, § 1, p. 381;

C.S.1922, § 5664;

C.S.1929, § 76-270;

Laws 1943, c. 170, § 1, p. 593;

R.S.1943, § 76-227.